New Jersey, session 222, A1247.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the maximum percentage of a municipalitys affordable fair share housing obligation which the municipality may meet by age-restricted units shall be 50 percent. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.